Massachusetts, session 194th, H389.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 93 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after Section 114, the following 3 new sections:-
“Section 115. Definitions
As used in sections 115 to 117, inclusive, the following words shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
a) ‘Seller,’ any person, firm, corporation, partnership, unincorporated association,
franchise, franchisor, or other business enterprise which promotes or exchanges goods or
services for money.
of 6

b) ‘Trial offer,’ an offer to a consumer by a seller for products or services without cost, at
a reduced cost, for a rebate, for only incidental costs such as shipping fees or for a time-limited
trial period under which the consumer is required to act affirmatively to avoid incurring a future
financial obligation as a result of accepting the offer.
c) ‘Consumer,’ any person who seeks to accept or accepts a trial offer.
d) ‘Clear and conspicuous,’ (including the terms clearly and conspicuously), the material
representation being disclosed is of such size, color, contrast or audibility and is so presented as
to be readily noticed and understood by a reasonable person to whom it is being disclosed.
e) ‘Affirmative Consent,’ a consumer’s express agreement to incur a clearly and
conspicuously disclosed financial obligation as a result of accepting a trial offer; such agreement
shall be made in a manner specifically identified for the consumer to indicate the consumer’s
express agreement to incur the clearly and conspicuously disclosed financial obligation.
f) ‘Financial Institution,’ an institution (public or private) that collects funds (from the
public or other institutions) and invests them in financial assets.
Section 116. Charges after a trial offer, required disclosures
a) Trial offer disclosures. A seller may not make a trial offer to a consumer, or impose a
financial obligation on the consumer as a result of the consumer’s acceptance of a trial offer,
unless:
i) The seller provides the consumer with clear and conspicuous information regarding the
terms of the trial offer prior to the consumer’s acceptance of the offer, including, at a minimum:
of 6

1) Any additional financial obligations that may be incurred as a result of accepting the
trial offer;
2) Identification of all goods or services, or enrollments in a membership, subscription or
service contract that the consumer will receive or for which the consumer will incur a financial
obligation as a result of accepting the trial offer;
3) The cost to the consumer of any financial obligation the consumer will incur if the
consumer accepts the trial offer, including any fees or charges;
4) A statement, if applicable, that by accepting the trial offer, the consumer will become
obligated for additional goods or services, or enrollment in a membership, subscription or service
contract unless the consumer takes affirmative action to cancel the trial offer;
5) Instructions as to the means by which the consumer is to indicate the consumer’s
rejection or cancellation of the offer;
6) The time period during which the consumer must cancel in order to avoid incurring a
financial obligation as a result of accepting the trial offer; and
7) The calendar date on which the consumer will incur any additional financial obligation
if the consumer fails to cancel the trial offer within the relevant time period.
b) Cancellation. A seller must inform the consumer, prior to the consumer’s acceptance
of the trial offer, of the specific steps by which the consumer may cancel the agreement. The
means for cancellation provided by the seller, shall at a minimum, enable the consumer to cancel
the trial offer by calling a toll-free telephone number and, if the offer was not accepted by
telephone, to cancel in a manner substantially similar to that by which the consumer accepted the
of 6

trial offer, including but not limited to, electronic email address, website, postal address or
another cost-effective, timely and easy-to-use mechanism for cancellation.
c) Affirmative consent. A seller may not impose a financial obligation on a consumer as a
result of the consumer’s acceptance of a trial offer unless the seller has obtained the consumer’s
affirmative consent to the terms of the trial offer set forth in subsection (a)(i) of this section.
d) Additional notice to consumer. A seller whose trial offer exceeds thirty (30) calendar
days must provide additional notice to the consumer within no more than ten (10) and no fewer
than five (5) calendar days prior to the date upon which the consumer will incur an additional
financial obligation as a result of accepting the offer. The notification shall include the calendar
date on which the consumer will be charged for additional goods or services or for automatic
renewal. The notification shall be provided in a manner substantially similar to that by which the
consumer accepted the trial offer and shall clearly and conspicuously disclose the means by
which the consumer may cancel the offer. The means of cancellation must conform to
subsection (b) of this section.
e) Burden on seller. The seller has the burden of proving that the consumer expressly
agreed to this arrangement and that the required notices were provided within the time limits set
forth.
f) “Data pass” prohibition. A seller may not cause a consumer to incur a financial
obligation to another seller as a result of accepting a trial offer unless:
i) The consumer gives affirmative consent to the seller at the time the consumer accepts
the trial offer allowing the seller to provide the consumer’s billing information to a seller other
of 6

than the seller making the trial offer. Such affirmative consent shall conform to subsection (c) of
this section.
g) Violation. Any violation of this section shall constitute an unfair or deceptive act or
practice in violation of Chapter 93A.
Section 117. Prohibited Disclosures
(a) Disclosure of financial and personal information prohibited
Except as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, a financial institution, its officers,
employees, agents and directors shall not disclose any financial or personal information relating
to a customer. Financial institutions shall adopt reasonable procedures to assure compliance with
this subchapter.
(b) Exceptions
This section does not prohibit any of the activities listed in this subsection. This
subsection shall not be construed to require any financial institution to make any disclosure not
otherwise required by law. This subsection shall not be construed to require or encourage any
financial institution to alter any procedures or practices not inconsistent with this section. This
subsection shall not be construed to expand or create any authority in any person or entity other
than a financial institution.
(1) Disclosure of information to the customer after proper identification.
(2) Disclosure authorized by the customer, provided the disclosure is limited to the scope
and purpose that the customer authorizes.
of 6

(c) Violations
A financial institution who violates this section commits an unfair and deceptive act and a
violation of chapter 93A.
of 6